Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
Cross references.

- Authority of General Assembly to restrict land use so as to protect and preserve natural resources, environment, and vital areas of state, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. II.

Game and fish generally, T. 27.

Water rights generally, T. 44, C. 8.

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey of law on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (1983). For article discussing recent developments in environmental law, see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 411 (1987). For article, "Energy Partnership," see 65 Emory L.J. 695 (2016). For annual survey on environmental law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1007 (2019).
For note, "What Does 'Green' Mean?
Anthropogenic Climate Change, Geoengineering, and International Environmental Law," see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 901 (2009).